src/morphology/stems/adj.lexc
LEXICON ADJ_PURTU
!!  The quantitative gradation of t after r in u stems is in class
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}}, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻J.
!!  The common u stem after r is in nut participle’s passive’s back form (-tu):
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~r u
!!€  purtu: purtu+A+Sg+Nom # bitten
!!€  purrussa: purtu+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  purtuihin: purtu+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  purruista: purtu+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  purrumpi: purtu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  purruin: purtu+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ru  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:ru  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ru  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ru  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_PIERTY
!!  The quantitative gradation of t after r in y stems is in class
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}}, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻J.
!!  The common u stem after r is in nut participle’s passive’s front fomr
!!  (-ty):
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~r y
!!€  pierty: pierty+A+Sg+Nom # befarted
!!€  pierryssä: pierty+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  piertyihin: pierty+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  pierryistä: pierty+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  pierrympi: pierty+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  pierryin: pierty+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ry  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:ry  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ry  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ry  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  There are no adjectives ending in -rtö. Just as well, the
!!  class for UkU : UvU- is limited to few nouns we know.

!!  !The special illative alternation with k gradation, unaltering stems
!!  The trisyllabic words ending with gradating long k have plural illative
!!  in both strong and weak forms. 


LEXICON ADJ_HUPAKKO
!!  The class for trisyllabic -kko stems is {{@LEXNAME@}}, the corresponding
!!  dictionary class is ⁴⁻D. 
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 4 o
!!€  hupakko: hupakko+A+Sg+Nom # silly girl
!!€  hupakoihin: hupakko+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  hupakkoihin: hupakko+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  hupakompi: hupakko+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  hupakoin: hupakko+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  !Adjective stems with i:e variations
!!  The i stems of new i final words have i : e : 0 variation. These classes
!!  include new loans ending in consonant, which use -i to form inflectional
!!  stems.
!!  The i stems combined with gradation of will form five separate stem
!!  variants:

LEXICON ADJ_ABNORMI
!!  The i finals with back vowel harmony go to class {{@LEXNAME@}}, where
!!  old dictionary classification was ⁵.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 5 back
!!€  abnormi: abnormi+A+Sg+Nom # abnorm
!!€  abnormeina: abnormi+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  abnormien: abnormi+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  abnormimpi: abnormi+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  abnormein: abnormi+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:i  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_STYDI
!!  The i finals with front vowel harmony go to class {{@LEXNAME@}}, where
!!  old dictionary classification was ⁵.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 5 front
!!€  stydi: stydi+A+Sg+Nom # stiff
!!€  stydeinä: stydi+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  stydien: stydi+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  stydimpi: stydi+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  stydein: stydi+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_OPAAKKI
!!  Stems with quantitative k gradation, i final and back harmony are in class 
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}} and dictionary class ⁵⁻A or ⁵⁻D.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 5 k~0 back
!!€  opaakki: opaakki+A+Sg+Nom # opaque
!!€  opaakissa: opaakki+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  opaakkeina: opaakki+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  opaakeista: opaakki+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  opaakkien: opaakki+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  opaakimpi: opaakki+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  opaakein: opaakki+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:ki  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ki  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ke  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ki  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:ki  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
0:ke  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:k  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:ke  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ke  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_PINKKI
!!  Stems with quantitative k gradation, i final and front harmony are in class
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}} and dictionary class ⁵⁻A or ⁵⁻D.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 5 k~0 front
!!€  pinkki: pinkki+A+Sg+Nom # pink
!!€  pinkissä: pinkki+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  pinkkeinä: pinkki+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  pinkeistä: pinkki+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  pinkkien: pinkki+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  pinkimpi: pinkki+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  pinkein: pinkki+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:ki  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ki  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ke  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ki  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ki  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
0:ke  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:k  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:ke  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ke  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  There's no back vowel version of the bisyllabic gradating -ppi form.

LEXICON ADJ_SIPPI
!!  Stems with quantitative p gradation, i final and front harmony are in class
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}} and dictionary class ⁵⁻B.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 5 p~0 front
!!€  sippi: sippi+A+Sg+Nom # bust
!!€  sipissä: sippi+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  sippeinä: sippi+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  sipeistä: sippi+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  sippien: sippi+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  sipimpi: sippi+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  sipein: sippi+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:pi  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pi  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:pe  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:pi  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:pi  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
0:pe  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:p  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:pe  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:i  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:pe  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_HURTTI
!!  Stems with quantitative t gradation, i final and back harmony are in class
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}} and dictionary class ⁵⁻C.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 5 t~0 back
!!€  hurtti: hurtti+A+Sg+Nom # grunchy
!!€  hurtissa: hurtti+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  hurtteina: hurtti+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  hurteista: hurtti+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  hurttien: hurtti+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  hurtimpi: hurtti+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  hurtein: hurtti+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:ti  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:i  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJECTIVE
afferentti+A:afferent  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
aktiivi+A:aktiiv  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
akuutti+A:akuut  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
alikvootti+A:alikvoot  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
ambivertti+A:ambivert  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
aneuploidi+A:aneuploid  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
anonyymi+A:anonyym  ADJ_STYDI  ;
atsaspirasidiekvivalentti+A:atsaspirasidiekvivalent  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
atsidi+A:atsid  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
beesi+A:bees  ADJ_STYDI  ;
benigni+A:benign  ADJ_STYDI  ;
blondi+A:blond  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
charmantti+A:charmant  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
defekti+A:defekt  ADJ_STYDI  ;
diploidi+A:diploid  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
dominantti+A:dominant  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
ekvatoriaali+A:ekvatoriaal  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
elegantti+A:elegant  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
epäkoherentti+A:epä#koherent  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
epäkongruentti+A:epä#kongruent  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
epälojaali+A:epälojaal  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
epäsiisti+A:epäsiist  ADJ_STYDI  ;
epäsiisti+A:epä#siist  ADJ_STYDI  ;
epäsiisti+A:epäsiist  ADJ_STYDI  ;
erektiili+A:erektiil  ADJ_STYDI  ;
feikki+A:feik  ADJ_PINKKI  ;
fertiili+A:fertiil  ADJ_STYDI  ;
fetaali+A:fetaal  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
fiini+A:fiin  ADJ_STYDI  ;
haploidi+A:haploid  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
hiirakko+A:hiirak  ADJ_HUPAKKO  ;
hulivili+A:hulivil  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
hupakko+A:hupak  ADJ_HUPAKKO  ;
härski+A:härsk  ADJ_STYDI  ;
höyli+A:höyl  ADJ_STYDI  ;
idempotentti+A:idempotent  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
imbesilli+A:imbesill  ADJ_STYDI  ;
immanentti+A:immanent  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
impotentti+A:impotent  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
inkorrekti+A:inkorrekt  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
intiimi+A:intiim  ADJ_STYDI  ;
intresantti+A:intresant  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
invariantti+A:invariant  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
jämtti+A:jämtt  ADJ_STYDI  ;
karminatiivi+A:karminatiiv  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
kellertävänoranssi+A:kellertävänoranss  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
kelmi+A:kelm  ADJ_STYDI  ;
keskisuuri+A:keskisuur  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
kimurantti+A:kimurant  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
konfluentti+A:konfluent  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
konvergentti+A:konvergent  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
korni+A:korn  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
kretliini+A:kretliin  ADJ_STYDI  ;
kulturelli+A:kulturell  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
kurantti+A:kurant  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
laventelinpinkki+A:laventelinpink  ADJ_PINKKI  ;
laventelinpinkki+A:laventelin#pink  ADJ_PINKKI  ;
liinakko+A:liinak  ADJ_HUPAKKO  ;
likvidi+A:likvid  ADJ_STYDI  ;
lipilaari+A:lipilaar  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
lämpölabiili+A:lämpölabiil  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
läski+A:läsk  ADJ_STYDI  ;
metastabiili+A:metastabiil  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
militantti+A:militant  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
muli+A:mul  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
multivalentti+A:multivalent  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
mörkki+A:mörk  ADJ_PINKKI  ;
naiivi+A:naiiv  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
nonkonformisti+A:nonkonformist  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
opaakki+A:opaak  ADJ_OPAAKKI  ;
operantti+A:operant  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
paralleeli+A:paralleel  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
pedantti+A:pedant  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
pernisiöösi+A:pernisiöös  ADJ_STYDI  ;
pierty+A:pier  ADJ_PIERTY  ;
pieti+A:piet  ADJ_STYDI  ;
pinkki+A:pink  ADJ_PINKKI  ;
pipi+A:pip  ADJ_STYDI  ;
pluripotentti+A:pluripotent  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
populaari+A:populaar  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
primaari+A:primaar  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
primääri+A:primäär  ADJ_STYDI  ;
pseudoprostyyli+A:pseudoprostyyl  ADJ_STYDI  ;
puli+A:pul  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
punavioletti+A:punaviolet  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
punertavanoranssi+A:punertavanoranss  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
puolivilli+A:puoli#vill  ADJ_STYDI  ;
purtu+A:pur  ADJ_PURTU  ;
purulentti+A:purulent  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
raudikko+A:raudik  ADJ_HUPAKKO  ;
reaktiivi+A:reaktiiv  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
riski+A:risk  ADJ_STYDI  ;
ruskeanvioletti+A:ruskean#violet  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
savakko+A:savak  ADJ_HUPAKKO  ;
sentimentaali+A:sentimentaal  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
siisti+A:siist  ADJ_STYDI  ;
sinivioletti+A:sini#violet  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
sippi+A:sip  ADJ_SIPPI  ;
sisäsiisti+A:sisä#siist  ADJ_STYDI  ;
stereotyyppi+A:stereotyyp  ADJ_SIPPI  ;
stereotyyppi+A:stereo#tyyp  ADJ_SIPPI  ;
stydi+A:styd  ADJ_STYDI  ;
sutki+A:sutk  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
totipontentti+A:totipontent  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
ultramariini+A:ultra#mariin  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
ultravioletti+A:ultra#violet  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
ummikko+A:ummik  ADJ_HUPAKKO  ;
uniikki+A:uniik  ADJ_OPAAKKI  ;
vanhuudenheikko+A:vanhuudenheik  ADJ_HUPAKKO  ;
vanhuudenheikko+A:vanhuuden#heik  ADJ_HUPAKKO  ;
vanhuudenheikko+A:vanhuudenheik  ADJ_HUPAKKO  ;
villi+A:vill  ADJ_STYDI  ;
violetinpinkki+A:violetinpink  ADJ_PINKKI  ;
violetinpinkki+A:violetin#pink  ADJ_PINKKI  ;
violetti+A:violet  ADJ_HURTTI  ;
vissi+A:viss  ADJ_STYDI  ;
vulgaari+A:vulgaar  ADJ_ABNORMI  ;
väärti+A:väärt  ADJ_STYDI  ;
